Utah statutes.
35A-8-429.   Annual report -- Budget -- Minutes.

(1)  At least once a year, an authority shall file with the clerk, with a copy given to the governing body, a report containing:

(a)  its activities for the preceding year;

(b)  its approved annual budget; and

(c)  recommendations for legislation or other action considered necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(2)  An authority shall post electronically for public review its:

(a)  annual approved budget; and

(b)  minutes of all open meetings held by its board of commissioners.

